Mississippi, session 2026, SB2017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Sections 65-25-101 through 65-25-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the chapter of law that creates the 1950 Compact between Arkansas and Mississippi and established the Arkansas-Mississippi Bridge Commission, are hereby repealed. SECTION 2.  Sections 55-19-1 through 55-19-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the chapter of law that creates the Bienville Recreational District, are hereby repealed. SECTION 3.  Section 73-71-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Council of Advisors in Acupuncture, is hereby repealed. SECTION 4.  Section 43-1-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Interagency Council on Homelessness, is hereby repealed. SECTION 5.  Sections 55-11-1 through 55-11-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the chapter of law that creates the Harrison County Parkway Commission, are hereby repealed. SECTION 6.  Section 39-29-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Commission on the Holocaust, is hereby repealed, and the functions of this board shall be assumed by the Mississippi Department of Education. SECTION 7.  Section 39-5-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that provides for the control and management of Beauvoir, the Jefferson Davis Shrine, is hereby repealed. SECTION 8.  Section 7-1-601, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Advisory Council on Faith-Based Initiatives, is hereby repealed. SECTION 9.  Section 39-5-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Civil War Battlefield Commission, is hereby repealed. SECTION 10.  Section 89-5-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Electronic Recording Commission, is hereby repealed. SECTION 11.  Section 39-35-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War Commission, is hereby repealed. SECTION 12.  Section 55-23-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Commission, is hereby repealed. SECTION 13.  Section 49-17-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel, is hereby repealed. SECTION 14.  Sections 41-101-1 through 41-101-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the chapter of law that creates the Council on Obesity Prevention and Management, are hereby repealed. SECTION 15.  Sections 43-59-1 through 43-59-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the chapter of law that creates the Mississippi Commission on the Status of Women, are hereby repealed. SECTION 16.  Section 25-58-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Coordinating Council for Remote Sensing and Graphic Information Systems, is hereby repealed. SECTION 17.  Section 39-39-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that establishes the membership of the Mississippi Civil Rights Museum Advisory Commission, is hereby repealed, and the functions of this board shall be assumed by the Mississippi Department of Archives and History. SECTION 18.  Section 83-1-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the section of law that creates the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Coordinating Council, is hereby repealed. SECTION 19.  Sections 65-33-27 through 65-33-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, which are the sections of law that create and organize the Commission of Road Protection, are hereby repealed. SECTION 20.  Section 59-6-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which defines Deep Draft Harbor and Terminal, is hereby repealed. SECTION 21.  Section 17-18-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, which creates the Hazardous Waste Facility Siting Authority, is hereby repealed. SECTION 22.  Section 57-67-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, which creates the Mississippi Superconducting Super Collider Authority, is hereby repealed. SECTION 23.  Section 65-33-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-33-31.  Whenever it shall become necessary to construct, widen, or protect any highway under the provisions hereof, the * * * road protection commission board of supervisors shall make publication for thirty (30) days in some newspaper published in the county wherein such improvements are made, setting forth the commencement and termination, with a general outline of the nature and extent thereof.  When any owner of land or other person shall claim compensation for land taken for such purpose, or for damage sustained by the construction, widening, improvement, or protection of such road or highway, he or she shall petition the board of supervisors in writing within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the time provided for such publication, setting forth the nature and character of the damages claimed.  Thereupon the board shall, on five (5) days' notice to petitioner, go on the premises and assess the damages sustained by him or her.  The finding of the board shall be in writing, signed by the members agreeing to it, and must be entered on the minutes at the next meeting; but if the damages sustained and claimed be less than the cost of assessing, the board may allow the same without inquiry. SECTION 24.  Section 65-33-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-33-33.  All proceedings of the board of supervisors * * * and the road protection commission in widening, improving, or protecting any such highway and assessing damages therefor may be reviewed by the circuit court in respect to any matter of law arising on the face of the proceeding.  On the question of damages, the case may be tried anew and the damages may be assessed by a jury if the owner of the land so desires.  The board of supervisors shall grant appeals for that purpose when prayed for, on appellant giving bond for cost in such penalty as the board may require, not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), payable to the county. SECTION 25.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.